Hawaii statutes.
[§226-18.5] Objectives and policies for
facility systems--telecommunications. (a) Planning for the State's
telecommunications facility systems shall be directed towards the achievement
of dependable, efficient, and economical statewide telecommunications systems
capable of supporting the needs of the people.

(b) To achieve the telecommunications
objective, it shall be the policy of this State to ensure the provision of
adequate, reasonably priced, and dependable telecommunications services to
accommodate demand.

(c) To further achieve the telecommunications
objective, it shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Facilitate research and development of
telecommunications systems and resources;

(2) Encourage public and private sector efforts to
develop means for adequate, ongoing telecommunications planning;

(3) Promote efficient management and use of existing
telecommunications systems and services; and

(4) Facilitate the development of education and
training of telecommunications personnel. [L 1994, c 96, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next